Nevada, session 83, SB199.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 52 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3, 4 and 5 of this
act have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Artificial intelligence company” means a person
who:
1. Is registered with the Bureau pursuant to section 6 of this
act;
2. Develops an artificial intelligence system that:
(a) Is primarily used to generate:
(1) Legal documents;
(2) Images of natural persons through which services are
provided; or
(3) Recommended rent prices for dwelling units; or
(b) Is trained using data collected from searches conducted on
a social media platform; and
3. Either:
(a) Sells the artificial intelligence system to another person; or
(b) Enters into a contractual arrangement with another person
that, by its terms, expressly allows customers of the person to use
the artificial intelligence system in exchange for a fee paid by the
person to the artificial intelligence company.
-
*SB199_R1*

– 4 –
Sec. 4. “Artificial intelligence system” means any machine-
based system that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from
the inputs such system receives how to generate outputs,
including, without limitation, content, decisions, predictions or
recommendations, that can influence physical or virtual
environments.
Sec. 5. “Bureau” means the Bureau of Consumer Protection
in the Office of the Attorney General.
Sec. 6. 1. A person shall not engage in the business of an
artificial intelligence company in this State unless the person is
registered with the Bureau pursuant to this section.
2. A person who wishes to register with the Bureau as an
artificial intelligence company must submit to the Bureau the fee
established pursuant to subsection 4 and an application, on a form
prescribed by the Bureau, which contains:
(a) The name and address of the applicant;
(b) Information concerning the nature of the data the person
maintains and the locations at which such data is stored; and
(c) Such other information as the Bureau may require by
regulation.
3. Registration as an artificial intelligence company expires 1
year after issuance and may be renewed upon submission of the
fee established pursuant to subsection 4 and an application for
renewal, on a form prescribed by the Bureau, which contains:
(a) Information concerning the nature of the data the
company maintains and the locations at which such data is stored;
and
(b) Such other information as the Bureau may require by
regulation.
4. The Bureau shall establish by regulation fees for the
issuance and renewal of a registration as an artificial intelligence
company.
Sec. 7. 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth in
this chapter, a natural person who applies for the issuance or
renewal of a registration as an artificial intelligence company
shall:
(a) Include the social security number of the applicant in the
application submitted to the Bureau.
(b) Submit to the Bureau the statement prescribed by the
Division of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of
Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS 425.520. The
statement must be completed and signed by the applicant.
2. The Bureau shall include the statement required pursuant
to subsection 1 in:
-
*SB199_R1*

– 5 –
(a) The application or any other forms that must be submitted
for the issuance or renewal of the registration; or
(b) A separate form prescribed by the Bureau.
3. A registration may not be issued or renewed by the Bureau
if the applicant:
(a) Fails to submit the statement required pursuant to
subsection 1; or
(b) Indicates on the statement submitted pursuant to
subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court order for the
support of a child and is not in compliance with the order or a
plan approved by the district attorney or other public agency
enforcing the order for the repayment of the amount owed
pursuant to the order.
4. If an applicant indicates on the statement submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 that the applicant is subject to a court
order for the support of a child and is not in compliance with the
order or a plan approved by the district attorney or other public
agency enforcing the order for the repayment of the amount owed
pursuant to the order, the Bureau shall advise the applicant to
contact the district attorney or other public agency enforcing the
order to determine the actions that the applicant may take to
satisfy the arrearage.
Sec. 8. 1. If the Bureau receives a copy of a court order
issued pursuant to NRS 425.540 that provides for the suspension
of all professional, occupational and recreational licenses,
certificates and permits issued to a person who is the holder of a
registration as an artificial intelligence company, the Bureau shall
deem the registration issued to that person to be suspended at the
end of the 30th day after the date on which the court order was
issued unless the Bureau receives a letter issued to the holder of
the registration by the district attorney or other public agency
pursuant to NRS 425.550 stating that the holder of the registration
has complied with the subpoena or warrant or has satisfied the
arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560.
2. The Bureau shall reinstate a registration that has been
suspended by a district court pursuant to NRS 425.540 if the
Bureau receives a letter issued by the district attorney or other
public agency pursuant to NRS 425.550 to the person whose
registration was suspended stating that the person whose
registration was suspended has complied with the subpoena or
warrant or has satisfied the arrearage pursuant to NRS 425.560.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB199_R1*

– 6 –
Sec. 11. If a person violates the provisions of section 6 of this
act, the Bureau may impose a civil penalty of not more than
$5,000 for each violation.
Sec. 12. The Bureau may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of sections 6 to 11, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 13. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
person who sells computer software that is capable of generating
legal documents through the use of an artificial intelligence
system must ensure that each legal document generated by the
software is reviewed by an attorney who is licensed in this State
before the document is provided to a customer in this State.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to any legal
document provided to a customer who is:
(a) An attorney who is licensed in this State;
(b) A law firm authorized to do business in this State;
(c) The State or any political subdivision thereof; or
(d) A court, judge, arbitrator or mediator in this State.
Sec. 14. 1. If the operator of a social media platform
provides users in this State with both a method to conduct a search
on the platform that will result in information concerning the
search being used to train an artificial intelligence system and a
method to conduct a search that will not have that result, the
operator must require a user to opt in before utilizing the method
that will result in information concerning the search being used to
train an artificial intelligence system. If a user does not opt in, the
operator shall allow the user to utilize the method that will not
have that result so long as the operator offers that method to users
in this State.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as applying to
any online application, Internet website or other online service
that is not a social media platform, including, without limitation,
an online application, Internet website or online service that
enables a user to search for information, products or locations but
which is not a social media platform or an online application,
Internet website or online service used internally by an entity to
perform functions relating to human resources.
3. As used in this section, “social medial platform” means an
online application, Internet website or other online service that:
(a) Allows a person to:
(1) Become a registered user; and
(2) Establish an account, create a profile or otherwise
create, share and view user-generated content; and
(b) Serves as a medium for users to:
(1) Interact with other users through accounts, profiles or
other means; or
-
*SB199_R1*

– 7 –
(2) Interact with or otherwise view the content generated by
other users of the platform.
Sec. 15. 1. A person who is paid money for a service on the
condition that the service be provided by a natural person shall not
provide the service through an image of a natural person
generated by an artificial intelligence system.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
(a) The placement of a bet or wager in a licensed gaming
establishment, as defined in NRS 463.0169; or
(b) The provision of any service, including, without limitation,
the reserving of hotel accommodations, through an artificial
intelligence system which is not paid for on the condition that the
service be provided by a natural person.
Sec. 16. 1. The Department of Employment, Training and
Rehabilitation shall develop a survey to determine the number and
type of jobs that have been lost because of the use of artificial
intelligence systems. The Department shall send the survey to
samples of employers of employees in this State who, based on
relevant academic studies, the Department determines are at risk
of losing their employment because of the use of artificial
intelligence systems.
2. Upon the receipt of the survey sent by the Department
pursuant to subsection 1, an employer shall complete the survey
and return the survey to the Department.
3. On or before December 1 of each year, the Department
shall compile the statistical data obtained from the survey sent by
the Department pursuant to subsection 1 into a report in an
aggregated format which does not reveal the identity of any
employer, employee or other person and submit the report to:
(a) The Governor; and
(b) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislative Commission, if the report is received
during an odd-numbered year, or to the next session of the
Legislature, if the report is received during an even-numbered
year.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any data
and information obtained by the Department from a survey sent
pursuant to subsection 2 that identifies any employer, employee or
other person is confidential and must not be disclosed to any other
person without the prior written consent of the identifiable person.
Such information may be used for statistical purposes if the
identity of the person is not discernible from the information
disclosed.
5. For the purposes of this section, the use of an artificial
intelligence system by an employer to temporarily fulfill the job
-
*SB199_R1*

– 8 –
duties of an employee who is temporarily absent from employment
does not constitute a job that has been lost because of the use of
an artificial intelligence system.
6. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Department” means the Department of Employment,
Training and Rehabilitation.
(b) “Employer” includes a public employer and a private
employer.
Sec. 16.5. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
-
*SB199_R1*

– 9 –
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
-
*SB199_R1*

– 10 –
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, section 16 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter
478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes
of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
-
*SB199_R1*

– 11 –
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 17. Chapter 247 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A county recorder shall develop, implement and maintain
policies, procedures and protocols to verify the identity of any
person filing a document and to protect against fraud committed
in the filing of a document through the use of an artificial
intelligence system.
2. As used in this section, “artificial intelligence system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 18. Chapter 289 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each law enforcement agency shall develop, maintain and
periodically update a policy concerning the use of artificial
intelligence systems by the law enforcement agency, including,
without limitation, the use of such systems to generate reports, the
use of such systems for the purposes of facial recognition and
other uses of such systems by the law enforcement agency. The
policy must be designed to ensure the protection of the civil and
constitutional rights of the members of the public.
2. Each law enforcement agency shall submit the policy
developed and maintained by the agency and any update to the
policy to the Bureau of Consumer Protection in the Office of the
Attorney General.
3. As used in this section, “artificial intelligence system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 19. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 20. NRS 598A.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598A.060 1. Every activity enumerated in this subsection
constitutes a contract, combination or conspiracy in restraint of
-
*SB199_R1*

– 12 –
trade, and it is unlawful to conduct any part of any such activity in
this State:
(a) Price fixing, which consists of raising, depressing, fixing,
pegging or stabilizing the price of any commodity or service, and
which includes, but is not limited to:
(1) Agreements among competitors to depress prices at
which they will buy essential raw material for the end product.
(2) Agreements to establish prices for commodities or
services.
(3) Agreements to establish uniform discounts, or to
eliminate discounts.
(4) Agreements between manufacturers to price a premium
commodity a specified amount above inferior commodities.
(5) Agreements not to sell below cost.
(6) Agreements to establish uniform trade-in allowances.
(7) Establishment of uniform cost surveys.
(8) Establishment of minimum markup percentages.
(9) Establishment of single or multiple basing point systems
for determining the delivered price of commodities.
(10) Agreements not to advertise prices.
(11) Agreements among competitors to fix uniform list
prices as a place to start bargaining.
(12) Bid rigging, including the misuse of bid depositories,
foreclosures of competitive activity for a period of time, rotation of
jobs among competitors, submission of identical bids, and
submission of complementary bids not intended to secure
acceptance by the customer.
(13) Agreements to discontinue a product, or agreements
with anyone engaged in the manufacture of competitive lines to
limit size, styles or quantities of items comprising the lines.
(14) Agreements to restrict volume of production.
(b) Division of markets, consisting of agreements between
competitors to divide territories and to refrain from soliciting or
selling in certain areas.
(c) Allocation of customers, consisting of agreements not to sell
to specified customers of a competitor.
(d) Tying arrangements, consisting of contracts in which the
seller or lessor conditions the sale or lease of commodities or
services on the purchase or leasing of another commodity or service.
(e) Monopolization of trade or commerce in this State,
including, without limitation, attempting to monopolize or otherwise
combining or conspiring to monopolize trade or commerce in this
State.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, consolidation,
conversion, merger, acquisition of shares of stock or other equity
-
*SB199_R1*

– 13 –
interest, directly or indirectly, of another person engaged in
commerce in this State or the acquisition of any assets of another
person engaged in commerce in this State that may:
(1) Result in the monopolization of trade or commerce in this
State or would further any attempt to monopolize trade or commerce
in this State; or
(2) Substantially lessen competition or be in restraint of
trade.
(g) Establishment by a landlord of a price for rent for a
dwelling unit that is based upon a recommendation provided by an
artificial intelligence system that generates recommended prices
for rent using nonpublic information provided to the system by
multiple landlords concerning the prices charged by those
landlords for rent.
2. The provisions of paragraph (f) of subsection 1 do not:
(a) Apply to a person who, solely for an investment purpose,
purchases stock or other equity interest or assets of another person if
the purchaser does not use his or her acquisition to bring about or
attempt to bring about the substantial lessening of competition in
this State.
(b) Prevent a person who is engaged in commerce in this State
from forming a subsidiary corporation or other business
organization and owning and holding all or part of the stock or
equity interest of that corporation or organization.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence system” has the meaning ascribed to
it in section 4 of this act.
(b) “Dwelling unit” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118A.080.
(c) “Landlord” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118A.100.
(d) “Rent” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 118A.150.
Sec. 21. Chapter 657 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Commissioner may adopt regulations establishing
requirements and restrictions on the use of artificial intelligence
systems by persons licensed by the Commissioner pursuant to
chapters 604A, 604C, 604D, 649, 672, 673, 675, 676A or 677 of
NRS as the Commissioner determines to be necessary to protect
the privacy and security of data relating to the finances of
customers and the effective management of such persons. Such
requirements and restrictions may include, without limitation,
requirements and restrictions on the use of data relating to the
finances of customers for the purposes of training an artificial
intelligence system.
-
*SB199_R1*

– 14 –
2. As used in this section, “artificial intelligence system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 22. NRS 657.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
657.150 As used in NRS 657.150 to 657.290, inclusive, and
section 21 of this act unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 657.160 and 657.170 have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 23. Chapter 679A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 24 and 25 of this act.
Sec. 24. 1. An insurer shall not use any data collected by
the insurer that relates to the health of an insured to train an
artificial intelligence system developed by the insurer unless:
(a) The insurer has obtained the affirmative, voluntary
consent of the insured to whom such data relates; and
(b) Before giving the consent specified in paragraph (a), the
insured has been provided with a clear and conspicuous statement
informing the insured that:
(1) Data relating to his or her health may be used to train
an artificial intelligence system if he or she consents; and
(2) The insured has the right to withhold his or her
consent.
2. As used in this section, “artificial intelligence system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 25. 1. An insurer shall adopt practices designed to
ensure that the use of an artificial intelligence system by the
insurer does not result in the commission of an unfair or deceptive
trade practice in violation of the provisions of NRS 686A.010 to
686A.310, inclusive.
2. An insurer shall develop, implement and maintain a plan
for the responsible use of artificial intelligence systems by the
insurer. The plan must:
(a) Be in writing; and
(b) Include, without limitation, a plan for the acquisition, use
or reliance upon artificial intelligence systems which are
developed by a third party. Such a plan may include, without
limitation, the establishment of standards, policies and procedures
relating to:
(1) The inclusion of terms in a contract with such a third
party that requires the third party to cooperate with the insurer
with respect to regulatory inquiries and investigations relating to
the use of the insurer of the products or services of the third party.
(2) The performance of contractual rights regarding audits
or activities to confirm the compliance of the third party with
contractual requirements and applicable statutory or regulatory
requirements.
-
*SB199_R1*

– 15 –
Sec. 26. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
establish the Working Group on the Use of Artificial Intelligence
Systems in Education to conduct an assessment and develop certain
policies and guidance relating to the use of artificial intelligence
systems during the 2025-2026 interim.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall appoint such
number of members of the Working Group as he or she determines
is appropriate to carry out the duties of the Working Group, but not
less than:
(a) One-half of the members of the Working Group must:
(1) Be teachers licensed pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS;
(2) Teach at a public elementary or secondary school in this
State; and
(3) Have knowledge of the use of artificial intelligence
systems in education;
(b) One member must be a classified employee of a school
district other than a licensed teacher;
(c) One member must be the administrator of a public school;
(d) One member must be an administrator of a school district;
(e) One member must be a member of the faculty of a
university, college or community college who has a expertise in
artificial intelligence systems and their uses in education;
(f) One member must be a representative of private business or
industry who has expertise in artificial intelligence systems and their
uses in education; and
(g) Five members must be pupils enrolled in a public school
who are representative of a variety of demographic groups and of
which one member must be an at-risk pupil, as defined in NRS
387.1211, one member must be enrolled in a magnet school and one
member must be enrolled in a charter school.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate the
Chair and Vice Chair of the Working Group. A majority of the
members of the Working Group constitutes a quorum for
the transaction of business, and a majority of those members present
at any meeting is sufficient for any official action taken by the
Working Group.
4. The Working Group shall, during the 2025-2026 interim:
(a) Conduct an assessment of the current and future state of the
use of artificial intelligence systems in education;
(b) Develop guidance for school districts and charter schools on
the safe use of artificial intelligence systems in education; and
(c) Develop a model policy for school districts and charter
schools regarding the safe and effective use of artificial intelligence
systems in a manner that benefits and does not negatively impact
pupils and teachers.
-
*SB199_R1*

– 16 –
5. The assessment required by paragraph (a) of subsection 4
must:
(a) Assess the current state of artificial intelligence systems used
by school districts and charter schools, including, without limitation,
an assessment of:
(1) The artificial intelligence systems most commonly in use
in school districts and charter schools, including, without limitation:
(I) The typical cost of those systems;
(II) The ownership structure of those systems;
(III) The ownership structure of material created by pupils
and employees through the use of those systems;
(IV) The licensing agreements for the use of those
systems;
(V) The ability to access source code for those systems;
and
(VI) The degree to which teachers were involved in the
decision to use those systems;
(2) The extent to which artificial intelligence systems are a
topic of instruction in developing class content; and
(3) Potential developments in the use of artificial intelligence
systems in education;
(b) Identify current uses of artificial intelligence systems in
educational settings, including, without limitation:
(1) Uses of artificial intelligence systems in a manner that is
human-centered and that aids, furthers and improves teaching,
learning and the work of teachers, including, without limitation, in a
manner that does not exacerbate existing inequities;
(2) Uses of artificial intelligence systems in a manner that
serves as a replacement for humans and which may negatively
impact the development of pupils, jeopardize the security of data
relating to pupils or put the jobs of teachers at risk; and
(3) Uses of strategies to ensure that there is sufficient
opportunity for stakeholders to offer meaningful feedback before
any form of an artificial intelligence system is introduced to pupils
and teachers;
(c) Identify ways in which the State may support teachers in
developing and sharing effective practices for the use of artificial
intelligence systems that minimize risk and maximize benefits to
pupils and teachers, which may include, without limitation, the
establishment of committees or other similar bodies to study issues
relating to the use of artificial intelligence systems in education; and
(d) On or before January 1, 2027, be submitted, along with any
findings and recommendations relating to the assessment, to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
84th Session of the Legislature.
-
*SB199_R1*

– 17 –
6. The guidance required by paragraph (b) of subsection 4
must:
(a) Address the following subjects concerning the use of
artificial intelligence systems:
(1) Academic integrity and plagiarism;
(2) Acceptable and unacceptable uses of artificial
intelligence systems for pupils and teachers;
(3) The security and privacy of data relating to pupils and
teachers;
(4) Access by parents or guardians to information that pupils
have inputted into an artificial intelligence system; and
(5) The procurement of software to ensure the safety and
privacy of pupils and teachers and the protection of data relating to
pupils and teachers; and
(b) On or before January 1, 2026, be posted on the Internet
website of the Department of Education.
7. The model policy required by paragraph (c) of subsection 4
must address the following subjects concerning the use artificial
intelligence systems:
(a) Academic integrity and plagiarism;
(b) Acceptable and unacceptable uses of artificial intelligence
systems for pupils and teachers;
(c) The security and privacy of data relating to pupils and
teachers;
(d) The use of artificial intelligence systems for the purposes of
lesson planning;
(e) Access by parents or guardians to information that pupils
have inputted into an artificial intelligence system;
(f) The procurement of software to ensure the safety and privacy
of pupils and teachers and the protection of data relating to pupils
and teachers;
(g) The effective use of artificial intelligence systems to support,
and avoid risk to, teaching and learning;
(h) Effective strategies to ensure that artificial intelligence
systems do not exacerbate existing inequities in the education
system; and
(i) Effective strategies for professional development for teachers
on the use of artificial intelligence systems.
8. In conducting the assessment required by paragraph (a) of
subsection 4, the Working Group shall:
(a) Solicit input from teachers and pupils concerning their
experiences in using artificial intelligence systems; and
(b) Conduct at least three public meetings to solicit input from
pupils, families and other relevant stakeholders.
-
*SB199_R1*

– 18 –
9. The Working Group shall comply with the provisions of
chapter 241 of NRS and shall conduct all meetings and activities in
accordance with that chapter.
10. The Department of Education shall provide the Working
Group with such administrative support as is necessary to assist the
Working Group in carrying out its duties pursuant to this section.
11. As used in this section, “artificial intelligence system” has
the meaning ascribed to it in section 4 of this act.
Sec. 27. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 28. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 27, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 7 and 8 of this act expire by limitation on the date
on which the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 666 requiring each state to
establish procedures under which the state has authority to withhold
or suspend, or to restrict the use of professional, occupational and
recreational licenses of persons who:
(a) Have failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to
a proceeding to determine the paternity of a child or to establish or
enforce an obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Are in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children,
 are repealed by the Congress of the United States.
H
-
*SB199_R1*